Washington statutes.
RCW 41.22.010

Legislative findings.

The career of a police officer is highly stressful, resulting in unacceptable rates of divorce, alcoholism, low morale and suicide. The nature of law enforcement work requires that much information be kept confidential, unfairly burdening the emotional capacity of law enforcement personnel. Police officers may become the hidden victims of society because of their daily work with crisis.

The legislature finds that law enforcement chaplains can provide emotional support for law enforcement personnel, including counseling, stress management, and family life counseling. The legislature also finds that law enforcement chaplains can serve as a crisis intervention resource for personnel of police, fire, and corrections departments, and medical examiners or coroners.

[ 1985 c 223 s 1.]